Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 28. CITIES, TOWNS AND VILLAGES

CHAPTER 1. CITIES AND TOWNS

Art. 974d-41. VALIDATION OF GOVERNMENTAL ACTS AND PROCEEDINGS OF MUNICIPALITIES OF MORE THAN 1.5 MILLION.

Sec. 1. APPLICATION. This article applies to any municipality having a population of 1.5 million or more.

Sec. 2. PROCEEDINGS VALIDATED. The governmental acts and proceedings of a municipality relating to a bond election that was held before December 1, 1991, and at which the ballot proposition was approved by more than 60 percent of the voters voting on the proposition are validated as of the dates they occurred. The validation includes the preparation and wording of the ballot proposition, any action taken by the municipality in calling and holding the bond election, and any other action taken by the municipality before the effective date of this article in connection with the issuance of any bonds approved in the bond election. The acts and proceedings may not be held invalid because they were not performed in accordance with law. A municipality may take any further action or conduct any further proceeding necessary to complete the issuance of the bonds approved at the bond election, and, when issued, the bonds are valid and binding obligations of the municipality in accordance with the terms of the bonds.

Sec. 3. EFFECT ON LITIGATION. This article does not apply to any matter that on the effective date of this article has been held invalid by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Sec. 4. RECOMMENDATION. The legislature recommends to the governing body of a municipality that it adopt the aggregate goals for the municipality's contracting with minority and women enterprises set forth in the June 1992, report of Texas Southern University as specified for the categories of construction, procurement, and professional services. A cause of action may not be maintained to enforce this section or to recover damages based on the failure of the municipality to follow the recommendation of this section.

Sec. 5. CONDITIONS AFFECTING EXPENDITURE OF BOND PROCEEDS. (a) Expenditures of the bond proceeds by the municipality shall:

(1) be made in accordance with the covenants of all ordinances enacted by the municipality before the bond election approving the bonds;

(2) benefit the residents of the municipality so that the benefits or expenditures, if feasible, reflect the demographic makeup of the municipality; and

(3) to the extent the proceeds are designated for housing in the municipality's bond proposition, be made for construction and rehabilitation of housing and all matters incidental to housing construction and rehabilitation on-site.

(b) This section applies cumulatively to the entire bond authorization, rather than to individual bond issues or contracts for the expenditure of the proceeds, and the municipality's governing body is responsible for making decisions on individual bond issues and contracts.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 2, eff. March 8, 1993.